Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1707
Designation of business incubation center; duration; termination.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a designation of a building as a business incubation center shall remain in effect for such time as agreed to by the public agency and the community board.

(2) A public agency which has a building or a portion of a building designated as a business incubation center and which desires to terminate such designation prior to the date agreed to in subsection (1) of this section may terminate such designation by notifying the community board at least two years before the time the building will be needed. Upon receipt of notification, the community board shall publicize the closing date of the center to the tenants and to the community.

Laws 1990, LB 409, § 7.